Utah statutes.
61-2c-402.   Disciplinary action.

(1)  Subject to the requirements of Section 61-2c-402.1, the commission, with the concurrence of the division, may impose a sanction described in Subsection (2) against a person if the person:

(a) (i)  is a licensee or person required to be licensed under this chapter; and

(ii)  violates this chapter; or

(b) (i)  is a certified education provider or person required to be certified to provide prelicensing or continuing education under this chapter; and

(ii)  violates this chapter.

(2)  The commission, with the concurrence of the director, may against a person described in Subsection (1):

(a)  impose an educational requirement;

(b)  impose a civil penalty against the individual or entity in an amount not to exceed the greater of:

(i)  $5,000 for each violation; or

(ii)  the amount equal to any gain or economic benefit derived from each violation;

(c)  deny an application for an original license;

(d)  do any of the following to a license under this chapter:

(i)  suspend;

(ii)  revoke;

(iii)  place on probation;

(iv)  deny renewal;

(v)  deny reinstatement; or

(vi)  in the case of a denial of a license or a suspension that extends to the expiration date of a license, set a waiting period for a person to apply for a license under this chapter;

(e)  issue a cease and desist order;

 	(f)  require the reimbursement of the division of costs incurred by the division related to the recovery, storage, or destruction of a record that the person disposes of in a manner that violates this chapter or a rule made under this chapter;

(g)  modify a sanction described in Subsections (2)(a) through (f) if the commission finds that the person complies with court ordered restitution; or

(h)  impose any combination of sanctions described in this Subsection (2).

(3) (a)  If the commission, with the concurrence of the division, issues an order that orders a fine or educational requirements as part of a disciplinary action against a person, including a stipulation and order, the commission shall state in the order the deadline by which the person shall comply with the fine or educational requirements.

(b)  If a person fails to comply with a stated deadline:

(i)  the person's license or certificate is automatically suspended:

(A)  beginning the day specified in the order as the deadline for compliance; and

(B)  ending the day on which the person complies in full with the order; and

(ii)  if the person fails to pay a fine required by an order, the division may begin a collection process:

(A)  established by the division by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(B)  subject to Title 63A, Chapter 8, Office of State Debt Collection.

(4) (a)  A person whose license was revoked under this chapter before May 11, 2010, may request that the revocation be converted to a suspension under this Subsection (4):

(i)  if the revocation was not as a result of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit; and

(ii)  by filing a written request with the division.

(b)  Upon receipt of a request to convert a revocation under this Subsection (4), the commission, with the concurrence of the director, shall determine whether to convert the revocation.

(c)  The commission may delegate to the division the authority to make a decision on whether to convert a revocation.

(d)  If the division, acting under Subsection (4)(c), denies a request to convert a revocation, the person who requests the conversion may appeal the decision in a hearing conducted by the commission:

(i)  after the division denies the request to convert the revocation; and

(ii)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(e)  The commission may delegate to the division or an administrative law judge the authority to conduct a hearing described in Subsection (4)(d).

